apertium-yaq.yaq.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Hiaki (yaq)

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories

%<n%>       ! Noun
%<vblex%>   ! Verb
%<adj%>     ! Adjective
%<adv%>     ! Adverb
%<num%>     ! Number
%<det%>     ! Determiner
%<prn%>     ! Pronoun
%<dis%>     ! Discourse Word
%<intens%>  ! Intensifier (e.g. si ('very'))
%<cnjsub%>  ! Subordinating conjunction
%<cnjcoo%>  ! Coordinating conjunction
%<post%>    ! Postposition
%<quant%>   ! Quantifier

%<vbl%>     ! Verbalized
%<adjv%>    ! Adjetivalized
%<nml%>     ! Nominalized

!!!!!!!!!!!! Noun Morphology !!!!!!!!!!!!

! Case morphology

%<acc%>   ! Accusative case

%<loc%>   ! Locative
%<instr%> ! Instrumental

! Person morphology

%<p1%>   ! First person
%<p2%>   ! Second person
%<p3%>   ! Third person

!!!!!!!!!!!! Verb Morphology !!!!!!!!!!!!

! Tense morphology
%<past%>    ! Past tense
%<pres%>    ! Present tense
%<fut%>     ! Future

%<prog%>    ! Progressive
%<perf%>    ! Perfect
%<hab%>     ! Habitual

! Aspectual morphology
%<hab%>    ! Habitual
%<prog%>   ! Progressive

! Transitivity morphology
%<tr%>  ! Transitive
%<intr%>! Intransitive

! Additional verb morphology
%<caus%>   ! Causative
%<appl%>   ! Applicative
%<pass%>   ! Passive

%<dir%>    ! Directive (___ is telling ___ to ___)
%<desid%>  ! Desiderative (___ wants ___ to ___)
%<incep%>  ! Inceptive (___ is starting to ___)
%<prosp%>  ! Prospective (___ feels like ___)

%<emph%>   ! Emphatic

%<imp%>    ! Imperative

%<ppl%>    ! Participle

!!!!!!!!!!!! Adjective Morphology !!!!!!!!!!!!

%<mod%>    ! Denotes that the adjective is acting as a modifier of a noun (as opposed to a predicate)

!!!!!!!!!!!! Pronoun Morphology !!!!!!!!!!!!

%<poss%> ! Possessive ! Maybe should be determiner

%<dem%>  ! Demonstrative
%<prx%>  ! Proximal
%<med%>  ! Medial
%<dst%>  ! Distal

%<cli%>  ! Clitic

!!!!!!!!!!!! Other Morphology !!!!!!!!!!!!

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<sp%>  ! Undetermined

! Global tags
%<itr%> ! Interrogative

! Punctuation
%<sent%>! Sentence punctuation
%<cm%>  ! Comma ;
%<quot%> ! Quot ; 

! Miscellany
%<neg%>  ! Negation ;
%<inc%>  ! Incorporated
%<yn%>   ! Yes-or-No Word
%<loanword%>   ! Loaned, usually from Spanish

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary

!!!!!!!!!!!! Agreement Tags !!!!!!!!!!!!

%[%-bd%] ! Signifiies a bound root form
%[%+bd%] 

%[%-ubd%] ! Signifies an unbound form; for use in classes like nouns which might not always have bound forms -- so we don't have to have 2x every noun
! No %[%+ubd%] since [-ubd] rather conflicts with [+bd]

%[%-redup%] ! Signifies that reduplication has occurred, which can mean quite a number of things
%[%+redup%]


!!!!!!!!!!!! Archiphonemes !!!!!!!!!!!!

!!! Archiphonemes for Reduplication !!!
%{OREDUP1%}
%{OREDUP2%}
%{OREDUP3%}
%{VREDUP%}
%{OOREDUP4%}
%{OOREDUP5%}
%{OOREDUP6%}
%{CREDUP%}
%{GREDUP%}

!!! Archiphonemes for Suffixation !!!

%{T%} ! All nouns ending with t must end with %{T%}
%{CH%} ! Part of -im suffix
%{I%} ! Part of -im suffix

%{V%} ! The changing vowel of the past tense suffix on nouns

%{K%} ! Archiphoneme for past tense on verbs
%{AN%} ! Archiphoneme for past tense on verbs

%{K0%}  ! for locative

!!! Archiphonemes for Vowel Change !!!

%{EU%}
%{EO%}
%{AU%}
%{E%} ! archiphoneme after V', as in bwa'e


!!! Miscellaneous Archiphonemes !!!

%{LR%} ! l is affectionate; r derogatory

%{BLOCK%} ! Blocks other twol operation:0 ! 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
VerbRedup ;
AdjectiveRedup ; 
Adverb ; 
Determiner ;
Pronoun ;
Postposition ;
FunctionWords ;
Punctuation ;
Negation ;
LoanWord ;

LEXICON NounInfl

NounInflPPL ;
NounInflNominal ;
IncorporatedNoun ;

LEXICON NounInflPPL

%<n%>%<adjv%>:ka # ;

LEXICON IncorporatedNoun 

%<n%>%<inc%>+te%<vblex%>:te # ; ! means to make the thing; te alone not a verb ordinarily

%<n%>%<inc%>+ek%<vblex%>%<pres%>:ek # ; ! means to have the thing
%<n%>%<inc%>+ekan%<vblex%>%<past%>:ekan # ;
%<n%>%<inc%>+ne%<vblex%>%<fut%>:ne # ; 

! %<n%>%<inc%>+: VerbRedup ; ! currently eliminating noun incorporation functionality

LEXICON NounInflNominal 

%<n%>: NounNumberAgreement ; 
%<n%>%<acc%>:ta NounNumberAgreement ;  ! TODO: not sure if this actually can work... have to figure out order of morphemes
! %<n%>%<acc%>:t Locative ; ! Might be another spelling? The grammar is confusing.

LEXICON Locative

InLocative ;
TowardLocative ;
NearLocative ;
ToLocative ;
OnLocative ;
OnLocativeII ; 
Instrumental ;

NoLocative ;

LEXICON InLocative

%<loc%>:%{K0%}u # ; !

LEXICON TowardLocative

%<loc%>:kuni # ; !

LEXICON NearLocative

%<loc%>:napo # ; ! 

LEXICON OnLocative

%<loc%>:po # ; ! also maybe can be in, doesn't seem to line up to English words exactly

LEXICON OnLocativeII

%<loc%>:chi # ; ! as in "lay eyes on the bunny"

LEXICON ToLocative

%<loc%>:wi # ; ! to, as in speak to

LEXICON Instrumental

%<instr%>: mak # ; ! with

LEXICON NoLocative 

# ;

LEXICON NounNumberAgreement

%<sg%>: Locative ;
%<pl%>:%{CH%}%{I%}m Locative ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!! Basic Verb Tagging !!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON RegVerbInfl ! does not allow pass through bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<sp%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
%<vblex%>%<sp%>: VerbMorphologyInfl ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBd ! allows pass though bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<sp%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
%<vblex%>%<sp%>: VerbMorphologyDeriv ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflSg ! does not allow pass through bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<sg%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
%<vblex%>%<sg%>: VerbMorphologyInfl ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdSg ! allows pass though bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<sg%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
%<vblex%>%<sg%>: VerbMorphologyDeriv ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflPl ! does not allow pass through bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<pl%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
%<vblex%>%<pl%>: VerbMorphologyInfl ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdPl ! allows pass though bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<pl%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
%<vblex%>%<pl%>: VerbMorphologyDeriv ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflTr ! does not allow pass through bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<sp%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
RegVerbInflTransitive ;
RegVerbInflIntransitive ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflTransitive

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<sp%>:la VerbMorphologyInfl ; 
%<vblex%>%<sp%>%<tr%>:ta VerbMorphologyInfl ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflIntransitive

%<vblex%>%<sp%>%<intr%>:te VerbMorphologyInfl ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdTr ! allows pass though bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<sp%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
RegVerbInflBdTransitive ;
RegVerbInflBdIntransitive ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdTransitive 

%<vblex%>%<sp%>%<tr%>:ta VerbMorphologyDeriv ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdIntransitive

%<vblex%>%<sp%>%<intr%>:te VerbMorphologyDeriv ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflSgTr ! does not allow pass through bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<sg%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
RegVerbInflSgTransitive ;
RegVerbInflSgIntransitive ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflSgTransitive

%<vblex%>%<sg%>%<tr%>:ta VerbMorphologyInfl ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflSgIntransitive

%<vblex%>%<sg%>%<intr%>:te VerbMorphologyInfl ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdSgTr ! allows pass though bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<sg%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
RegVerbInflBdSgTransitive ;
RegVerbInflBdSgIntransitive ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdSgTransitive 

%<vblex%>%<sg%>%<tr%>:ta VerbMorphologyDeriv ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdSgIntransitive

%<vblex%>%<sg%>%<intr%>:te VerbMorphologyDeriv ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflPlTr ! does not allow pass through bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<pl%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
RegVerbInflPlTransitive ;
RegVerbInflPlIntransitive ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflPlTransitive 

%<vblex%>%<pl%>%<tr%>:ta VerbMorphologyInfl ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflPlIntransitive

%<vblex%>%<sg%>%<intr%>:te VerbMorphologyInfl ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdPlTr ! allows pass though bounded

%<v%>%<adjv%>%<pl%>:la AdjRedupAgreement ;
RegVerbInflBdPlTransitive ;
RegVerbInflBdPlIntransitive ;

LEXICON RegVerbInflBdPlTransitive

%<vblex%>%<pl%>%<tr%>:ta VerbMorphologyDeriv ;

LEXICON VerbRootRTYPEO ! For verbs with open syllable reduplication
yeʼe%[%-bd%]:yiʼi RegVerbInflBd ; ! dance
bwasa:bwasa RegVerbInfl ; ! cook(tr.)
bwasa%[%-bd%]:bwasaʼa RegVerbInflBd ; ! coteok(tr.)
kivacha%[%-bd%]:kivacha RegVerbInflBdSg ; ! bring(sg)
muuke:muuk%{EU%} RegVerbInflSg ; ! die(sg) !!O
muuke:muke RegVerbInflSg ; ! die(sg) (alternate spelling) !!O
hamte%[%-bd%]:hamti RegVerbInflBd ; ! break(intr.)
yaha:yaha RegVerbInflPl ; ! arrive(pl)
yaha%[%-bd%]:yai RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! arrive(pl)
neʼe:neʼ%{E%} RegVerbInfl ; ! fly
vaasu%[%-bd%]:vasoe RegVerbInflBd ; ! soak
toʼa:toʼa RegVerbInflPl ; ! pour, lay down(pl)
toʼa%[%-bd%]:toʼo RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! pour, lay down(pl)
eoʼotee%[%-bd%]:eoʼoteʼe RegVerbInflBd ; ! be nauseated
mea:mea RegVerbInflSg ; ! kill(sg)
mea%[%-bd%]:meʼe RegVerbInflBdSg ; ! kill(sg)
sua:su%{BLOCK%}a RegVerbInflPl ; ! kill(pl.obj) !!O
hoʼotia%[%-bd%]:hoʼotiu RegVerbInflBd ; ! snore
yepsa:yepsa RegVerbInflSg ; ! arrive(sg)
yepsa%[%-bd%]:yevih RegVerbInflBdSg ; ! arrive(sg)
aane:aane RegVerbInfl ; ! do/be/act
kaate:kaate RegVerbInflPl ; ! walk/go(pl)
kaate%[%-bd%]:kat RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! walk/go(pl)
weye:weye RegVerbInflSg ; ! walk(sg) ! possibly also pl? unclear if same walk.
wee%[%-bd%] RegVerbInflSg ; ! walk(sg)
teeka%[%-bd%]:tek RegVerbInflBd ; ! lay across
tuuse%[%-bd%]:tuh RegVerbInflBd ; ! grind
hahau:hahau RegVerbInflPl ; ! pick up(pl)
hahau%[%-bd%]:hahau RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! pick up(pl)
tovokta:tovokta RegVerbInflSg ; ! pick up(sg)
tovokta%[%-bd%]:tovokta RegVerbInflBdSg ; ! pick up(sg)
vuite:vuite RegVerbInflSg ; ! run(sg)
vuite%[%-bd%]:vuiti RegVerbInflBdSg ; ! run(sg)
tenne:tenne RegVerbInflPl ; ! run(pl)
tenne%[%-bd%]:tenni RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! run(pl)
siime:siime RegVerbInflSg ; ! go(sg)
siime:sime RegVerbInflSg ; ! go(sg) (alternate spelling)
siime%[%-bd%]:sim RegVerbInflBdSg ; ! go(sg)
saka%[%-bd%]:sakaʼa RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! go(pl)
mea%[%-bd%]:meʼe RegVerbInflBdSg ; ! kill(sg)
sua:sua RegVerbInflPl ; ! kill(pl)
sua%[%-bd%]:sua RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! kill(pl)
teka:teka RegVerbInfl ; ! lay.across !!O
chep:chep RegVerbInflTr ; ! jump
chih:chih RegVerbInflTransitive ; ! mash.pl
chip:chip RegVerbInflTransitive ; ! sip/taste
ham:ham RegVerbInflTr ; ! break
hap:hap RegVerbInflPlTr ; ! stand
hok:hok RegVerbInflIntransitive ; ! wheeze
huk:huk RegVerbInflTransitive ; ! sniff
hut:hut RegVerbInflTr ; ! abrade/scrape
kit:kit RegVerbInflTr ; ! knead
kik:kik RegVerbInflSgIntransitive ; ! stand.sg
kok:kok RegVerbInflIntransitive ; ! wear necklace/scarf
kon:kon RegVerbInflTr ; ! move.in.circle/encircle
kop:kop RegVerbInflTr ; ! forget/desirous(?)
kup:kup RegVerbInflIntransitive ; ! become.evening
kut:kut RegVerbInflTr ; ! tune/tighten
lot:lot RegVerbInflIntransitive ; ! tire
mah:mah RegVerbInflTransitive ; ! teach
moi:moi RegVerbInflTr ; ! ploq
muh:muh RegVerbInflIntransitive ; ! worship/genuflect
atbwa:atbwa RegVerbInfl ; ! laugh at
kuria%[%-bd%]:kuria RegVerbInflBd ; ! turn
hiia:hiia RegVerbInfl ; ! say. possibly sg.
bwan%[%-bd%]:bwan RegVerbInflBd ; ! cry
katek:katek RegVerbInflPl ; ! sit down 
chitoh:chitoh RegVerbInflTr ; ! slip
etah:etah RegVerbInflTransitive ; ! crack
halah:halah RegVerbInflIntransitive ; ! gasp
heok:heok RegVerbInflTransitive ; ! peel
heʼok:heʼok RegVerbInflIntransitive ; ! hiccup
ichak:ichak RegVerbInflTransitive ; ! be.bored
kamuk:kamuk RegVerbInflTransitive ; ! hold.in.mouth
kitok:kitok RegVerbInflIntransitive ; ! contract.muscle
kupik:kupik RegVerbInflIntransitive ; ! shut.eyes
mohak:mohak RegVerbInflTr ; ! rummage.through (trans or intrans); crumble
yotoh:yotoh RegVerbInflTransitive ; ! make.dull
LEXICON VerbRootRTYPEG ! For verbs with geminate "reduplication"
koko%[%-redup%]:kokko RegVerbInflPl ; ! die(pl)
koko%[%-bd%]:koko RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! die(pl)
koko%[%-bd%]%[%-redup%]:kokko RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! die(pl)
hima%[%-redup%]:himma RegVerbInfl ; ! discard/throw
hichike%[%-redup%]:hitchike RegVerbInfl ; ! sweeping
kiale%[%-redup%]:kikkiale RegVerbInfl ; ! enjoy taste of
kiima%[%-bd%]:kimaʼa RegVerbInflBdPl ; ! bring(pl)
kiima%[%-redup%]:kikkima  RegVerbInflPl ; ! bring(pl)
taʼa%[%-redup%]:tattaʼa RegVerbInfl ; ! fool
